New York, session 2025-2026, A6165.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. This act shall be known and may be cited as the "wetlands 2 homeowner's relief act". 3 § 2. The environmental conservation law is amended by adding a new 4 section 24-0303 to read as follows: 5 § 24-0303. Homeowners; wetlands. 6 1. A homeowner who currently lives within a wetlands designated area 7 shall not have to apply for building permits issued by the department 8 for use of land within fifty feet from the periphery of such homeowner's 9 house and garage. 10 2. Once the department has issued a wetlands map for any given 11 geographical area, a new map shall not be issued without approval by the 12 legislature. 13 3. The department is prohibited from delineating wetlands beyond the 14 boundaries of mapped wetlands shown on the department's official 15 wetlands maps. 16 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD08693-01-5